Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

General Provisions

62-5-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authorizing agent or agents” means a person or persons legally entitled to authorize the cremation of a dead human body or body parts. “Authorizing agent or agents” does not include a funeral director or funeral establishment;

“Board” means the board of funeral directors and embalmers;

“Cremation” means the heating process by which a human body or body parts are reduced to bone fragments through combustion and evaporation;

“Crematory” means the building or portion of a building that houses one (1) or more cremation chambers used for the reduction of body parts or bodies of deceased persons to cremated remains and the holding facility. “Crematory” includes crematorium;

“Embalming” means the preservation and disinfection, restoration or attempted preservation or disinfection of dead human bodies by the application of chemicals externally or internally, or both;

“Funeral directing” means the:

Practice of directing or supervising funerals or the practice of preparing dead human bodies for burial by any means, other than by embalming, or the disposition of dead human bodies;

Making of arrangements to provide for funeral services or the making of financial arrangements for the rendering of funeral services;

Provision or maintenance of a place for the preparation for disposition or for the care or disposition of dead human bodies;

Use of the word or term “funeral director,” “undertaker,” “mortician,” “funeral parlor,” “funeral chapel” or any other word or term from which can be implied the practice of funeral directing; or

Holding out to the public that one is a funeral director or engaged in a practice described in this subdivision (6);

For the purposes of this chapter, the following are exempted from the definition of “funeral directing”:

The sale, maintenance and beautification of grave spaces;

The sale, installation and maintenance of permanent grave or crypt markers;

The opening and closing of a grave or crypt and the provision of the necessary grave or crypt equipment required for the final interment or entombment of casketed human bodies or cremated human remains;

The sale and maintenance of crypts constructed of permanent material as an integral part of a group of crypts that are constructed on the site of intended use in a cemetery;

The sale and maintenance of above ground mausoleum crypts; and

The sale of funeral merchandise;

Nothing in this section shall be construed as in conflict with § 46-2-101;

“Funeral establishment” means any business, whether a proprietorship, partnership, firm, association or corporation, engaged in arranging, directing or supervising funerals for profit or other benefit, the preparing of dead human bodies for burial, the disposition of dead human bodies, the provision or maintenance of place for the preparation for disposition, or for the care or disposition of human bodies;

“Licensee” means an embalmer or funeral director who holds a license issued by the board;

“Licensing period” means the period of time that a funeral director's or embalmer's license is in effect in this state;

“Removal service”:

Means any person or entity that engages in arranging, directing, supervising or performing the transportation of deceased human remains for a fee; and

Does not include:

A licensed funeral director, a licensed embalmer, a licensed funeral establishment or person's employees;

A federal, state or county government agency involved in the transportation of deceased human remains; and

A private, for-profit ambulance service licensed pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Act of 1983, compiled in title 68, chapter 140, part 3;

“Resident trainee” or “apprentice” means a person who is engaged in learning to practice as a funeral director or embalmer, as the case may be, under the personal supervision and instruction of a duly licensed funeral director or embalmer of this state under this chapter; and

“State funeral directors association” means the Tennessee Funeral Directors Association or the Tennessee Funeral Directors and Morticians Association, a corporation.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 2 (Williams, § 7140.2); Acts 1968, ch. 542, § 1; 1972, ch. 553, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-501; Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 1; 2002, ch. 809, § 1; 2010, ch. 720, §§ 3, 4; 2013, ch. 437, § 1.

Cross-References. Cemetery merchandise and services, title 46, ch. 1, part 2.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Recipients of dead bodies to be notified of communicable diseases and AIDS, § 68-5-102.

Reports of certain injuries, § 38-1-101.

Rigid containers not mandatory for remains of certain children, § 68-4-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 9; 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 22; 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, §§ 14, 16.

Law Reviews.

Caskets “R” Us v. Tennessee Board of Funeral Directors: An open-and-shut case (Bill Haltom), 36 No. 10 Tenn. B.J. 37 (2000).

Torts — Crematorium as a Nuisance — Anticipatory Injunction — Psychic and Aesthetic Injury, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 329.

Do Your Job: Judicial Review of Occupational Licensing in the Face of Economic Protectionism, 70 Vand. L. Rev. 1663 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. Human-remains removal service owned by licensed funeral director or licensed embalmer as sole proprietorship is exempt from registration. Service organized as a corporation or LLC that is not a licensed funeral establishment and has a licensed funeral director or a licensed embalmer as an officer or manager is not exempt from registration. OAG 14-18, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/13/14).

62-5-102. Persons exempt from chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be constituted to prevent or interfere with the ceremonies, customs, religious rites or religion of any people, denomination or sect, to prevent or interfere with any religious denomination, sect or any body composed of persons of a denomination, or to prevent or interfere with any church or synagogue from having its committee or committees prepare human bodies for burial or to the families, friends or neighbors of deceased persons who prepare and bury their dead without charge.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 16 (Williams, § 7140.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-526; Acts 1997, ch. 169, § 1.

62-5-103. Penalty for violations.

A violation of this chapter is a Class C misdemeanor.

It is the duty of the district attorney general to prosecute violations of this chapter.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 21 (Williams, § 7140.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-527; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-5-104. Description of funeral merchandise.

All receptacles and containers used for burial, entombment or other final disposition of a dead human body or the remains of a dead human body shall bear in a conspicuous location on the outside, concise wording describing the material of which the receptacle or container is formed or manufactured, such as, but not limited to, 20 gauge steel, 32 oz. copper, solid oak, 12 gauge steel, reinforced concrete, preformed concrete, soft wood box, etc.

Every person who violates this section commits a Class A misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be fined no less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) per violation or shall be imprisoned for no less than ten (10) days nor more than ninety (90) days per violation, or both.

In addition to the other remedies, an action of injunction may be brought and maintained by the state of Tennessee or any other interested party or parties to enjoin the violation of this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 553, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 62-536 — 62-538; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section had been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for violation of chapter, § 62-5-103.

Rigid containers not mandatory for remains of certain children, § 68-4-112.

62-5-105. Hearings and judicial review.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 451, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-539.

62-5-106. Advertisements.

Any advertisement by a funeral director or embalmer for the sale of merchandise or services that indicates a specific price shall include an itemized listing of each and every item, procedure or service and shall show the price of the item. Failure to include the itemized price listing in any advertisement constitutes misrepresentation or fraud in the conduct of the business of the funeral establishment or false and misleading advertising as used in § 62-5-317.

Acts 1984, ch. 533, § 1.

62-5-107. Utilization of licensed crematory facilities by funeral directors — Penalty for violation —Limited civil liability.

A funeral director shall utilize the services only of licensed crematory facilities.

If a funeral director utilizes the services of a crematory outside of this state, the crematory must be a licensed facility of the state in which the crematory is located.

Prior to utilizing a crematory, the funeral director shall:

Determine that the crematory is currently licensed in this state or, if an out-of-state crematory, the state in which it is located;

Obtain and maintain a copy of the crematory's current license and further maintain a copy of the results of the latest regularly scheduled inspection of the crematory by the state in which the facility is located, if that state inspects crematories; and

Deliver a written disclosure to the authorizing agent or agents. The written disclosure shall, at a minimum:

Include the name, telephone number and address of the in-state or out-of-state crematory;

Provide for the specific consent of the authorizing agent or agents for the use of the in-state or out-of-state crematory;

Be signed and dated by the funeral director and the authorizing agent or agents; and

Be retained by the Tennessee funeral director at a licensed Tennessee funeral establishment, with a copy provided to the authorizing agent or agents.

Notwithstanding § 62-5-103, a violation for each use of an unlicensed crematory pursuant to this section shall be punishable only as provided by §§ 56-1-308 and 62-5-317 and any rules promulgated under §§ 56-1-308 and 62-5-317.

The funeral director shall not be liable for damages in a civil action for any error, inaccuracy or omission of any information delivered pursuant to this section if:

The error, inaccuracy or omission was based upon information provided by public agencies or by other individuals or entities providing information that is required to be disclosed pursuant to this section; and

The funeral director was not grossly negligent in obtaining the information from a third party and transmitting the information as required under this section.

It is an affirmative defense in any such civil action that the funeral director complied with the requirements of this section upon submitting to the court copies of the signed consent form and the license and inspection results of the in-state or out-of-state crematory used by the funeral director for the cremation of the dead human body or body parts that is the subject of the civil action.

Acts 2002, ch. 809, § 2.

62-5-108. Display of license on crematory vehicles transporting remains.

Any vehicle that transports a dead human body or body parts from a funeral establishment in this state to a crematory, other than a vehicle that is owned or operated by a funeral establishment and has the name of the funeral establishment on the outside of the vehicle, shall display a copy of the crematory's current license in the vehicle in such a way as to be visible from the outside of the vehicle during the time the body or body parts are in the vehicle.

This requirement is solely to provide notice to the funeral establishment that the dead human body or body parts are being released to the proper parties for the cremation of the body or body parts and no criminal penalty shall apply if the license is not so displayed.

Acts 2002, ch. 809, § 2.